Connecticut, session 2026, HB05179.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That subdivision (9) of section 10-262f of the general statutes be
amended to redefine "foundation" by increasing the amount and
including a provision to provide for annual increases based on certain
economic indicators.